Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202049-14,120
Commission; members; expenses.

All members of the commission shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 120;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 88;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 55;

Laws 2011, LB292, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 41.
January 1, 2021